Idaho, session 2025, H0112.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-3507, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-3507. EXECUTIVE BUDGET. (1) The executive budget document shall
consist of the following four (4) parts:
(1) (a) Part I of the executive budget document shall consist of a bud-
get message by the governor that shall outline the financial plan of the
executive department of the state government for the next fiscal year,
describing the important features of the financial plan.
(2) (b) Part II of the budget document shall present in detail for the
next fiscal year, as minimum information to be included in Part part II,
items showing estimates of agency needs based on the governor's recom-
mendations to meet the expenditure needs of the state from all available
funds classified by agencies and showing the cost of each major program.
Part II shall also set forth the governor's recommendations for the cap-
ital program. All moneys, including federal and local moneys and inter-
agency receipts received for any purpose, shall be accounted for in the
budget.
(3) (c) Part III of the budget document shall consist of the annual per-
formance plans required in section 67-1904, Idaho Code.
(4) (d) Part IV of the budget document shall consist of the federal
funding reports required under section 67-1917, Idaho Code, and the
disclosures required under section 67-3502(1)(e), Idaho Code.
(2) The executive budget document shall not contain logos, mottos, or
slogans of the executive branch or the governor, except for the great seal of
the state of Idaho and the governor's official logo.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.